Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-594.01.
Net energy metering provisions for electric cooperative service territories.

The Commission shall establish by regulation a program that affords eligible customer-generators the opportunity to participate in net energy metering in the service territory of each electric cooperative, which program shall commence on the later of
July 1, 2019, or the effective date of such regulations. Such regulations shall be similar to existing regulations promulgated pursuant to § 56-594. In lieu of adopting new regulations, the Commission may amend such existing regulations
to apply to electric cooperatives with such revisions as are required to comply with the provisions of this section. The regulations may include requirements applicable to (i) retail sellers, (ii) owners or operators of distribution
or transmission facilities, (iii) providers of default service, (iv) eligible customer-generators, or (v) any combination of the foregoing, as the Commission determines will facilitate the provision of net energy metering, provided
that the Commission determines that such requirements do not adversely affect the public interest.

As used in this section:

“Eligible customer-generator” means a customer that owns and operates, or contracts with other persons to own, operate, or both, an electrical generating facility that (i) has a capacity of not more than 20 kilowatts for residential customers and not
more than one megawatt for nonresidential customers on an electrical generating facility placed in service after July 1, 2015; (ii) uses as its total source of fuel renewable energy as defined in § 56-576; (iii) is located
on the customer’s premises and is connected to the customer’s wiring on the customer’s side of its interconnection with the distributor; (iv) is interconnected and operated in parallel with an electric company’s transmission
and distribution facilities; and (v) is intended primarily to offset all or part of the customer’s own electricity requirements. In addition to the electrical generating facility size limitations in clause (i), the capacity
of any generating facility installed under this section after July 1, 2015, shall not exceed the expected annual energy consumption based on the previous 12 months of billing history or an annualized calculation of billing
history if 12 months of billing history is not available.

“Net energy metering” means measuring the difference, over the net metering period, between (i) electricity supplied to an eligible customer-generator from the electric grid and (ii) the electricity generated and fed back to the electric grid by the eligible
customer-generator.

“Net metering period” means the 12-month period following the date of final interconnection of the eligible customer-generator’s system with an electric service provider, and each 12-month period thereafter.

The Commission’s regulations shall ensure that (i) the metering equipment installed for net metering shall be capable of measuring the flow of electricity in two directions and (ii) any eligible customer-generator seeking to participate in net energy
metering shall notify its supplier and receive approval to interconnect prior to installation of an electrical generating facility. The Commission shall publish a form for such prior notice and such notice shall be processed promptly
by the supplier prior to any construction activity taking place. After construction, inspection and documentation thereof shall be required prior to interconnection. The electric distribution company shall have 30 days from the
date of each notification for residential facilities, and 60 days from the date of each notification for nonresidential facilities, to determine whether the interconnection requirements have been met. Such regulations shall allocate
fairly the cost of such equipment and any necessary interconnection. An eligible customer-generator’s electrical generating system shall meet all applicable safety and performance standards established by the National Electrical
Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and accredited testing laboratories such as Underwriters Laboratories. In addition to the requirements set forth in this section and to ensure public safety, power quality,
and reliability of the supplier’s electric distribution system, an eligible customer-generator whose electrical generating system meets those standards and rules shall bear all reasonable costs of equipment required for the interconnection
to the supplier’s electric distribution system, including costs, if any, to (a) install additional controls, (b) perform or pay for additional tests, and (c) purchase additional liability insurance. An electric cooperative may
publish and use its own forms, including an electronic form, for purposes of implementing the regulations described herein so long as the information collected on the Commission’s form is also collected by the cooperative and submitted
to the Commission.

The Commission shall establish minimum requirements for contracts to be entered into by the parties to net metering arrangements. Such requirements shall protect the eligible customer-generator against discrimination by virtue of its status as an eligible
customer-generator and permit customers that are served on time-of-use tariffs that have electricity supply demand charges contained within the electricity supply portion of the time-of-use tariffs to participate as an eligible
customer-generator. Notwithstanding the cost allocation provisions of subsection C, eligible customer-generators served on demand charge-based time-of-use tariffs shall bear the incremental metering costs required to net meter
such customers.

If electricity generated by an eligible customer-generator over the net metering period exceeds the electricity consumed by the eligible customer-generator, the customer-generator shall be compensated for the excess electricity if the entity contracting
to receive such electric energy and the eligible customer-generator enter into a power purchase agreement for such excess electricity. Upon the written request of the eligible customer-generator, the supplier that serves the eligible
customer-generator shall enter into a power purchase agreement with the requesting eligible customer-generator that is consistent with the minimum requirements for contracts established by the Commission pursuant to subsection
D. The power purchase agreement shall obligate the supplier to purchase such excess electricity at the rate that is provided for such purchases in a net metering standard contract or tariff approved by the Commission, unless the
parties agree to a higher rate. The eligible customer-generator owns any renewable energy certificates associated with its electrical generating facility; however, at the time that the eligible customer-generator enters into a
power purchase agreement with its supplier, the eligible customer-generator shall have a one-time option to sell the renewable energy certificates associated with such electrical generating facility to its supplier and be compensated
at an amount that is established by the Commission to reflect the value of such renewable energy certificates. Nothing in this section shall prevent the eligible customer-generator and the supplier from voluntarily entering into
an agreement for the sale and purchase of excess electricity or renewable energy certificates at mutually agreed upon prices if the eligible customer-generator does not exercise its option to sell its renewable energy certificates
to its supplier at Commission-approved prices at the time that the eligible customer-generator enters into a power purchase agreement with its supplier. All costs incurred by the supplier to purchase excess electricity and renewable
energy certificates from eligible customer-generators shall be recoverable through its fuel adjustment clause. For purposes of this section, “all costs” shall be defined as the rates paid to the eligible customer-generator for
the purchase of excess electricity and renewable energy certificates and any administrative costs incurred to manage the eligible customer-generator’s power purchase arrangements. The net metering standard contract or tariff shall
be available to eligible customer-generators on a first-come, first-served basis, subject to the provisions of subsection F, and shall require the supplier to pay the eligible customer-generator for such excess electricity in a
timely manner at a rate to be established by the Commission.

Net energy metering shall be open to customers on a first-come, first-served basis until such time as the total capacity of the generation facilities, expressed in alternating current nameplate, reaches two percent of system peak for residential customers,
two percent of system peak for not-for-profit and nonjurisdictional customers, and one percent of system peak for other nonresidential customers, which are herein referred to as the electric cooperative’s caps. As used in this
subsection, “percent of system peak” refers to a percentage of the electric cooperative’s highest total system peak, based on the noncoincident peak of the electric cooperative or the coincident peak of all of the electric cooperative’s
customers, within the past three years as listed in Part O, Line 20 of Form 7 filed with the Rural Utilities Service or its equivalent, less any portion of the cooperative’s total load that is served by a competitive service provider
or by a market-based rate. Such caps shall not decrease but may increase if the system peak in any year exceeds the previous year’s system peak. Nothing in this subsection shall amend or confer new rights upon any existing nonjurisdictional
contract or arrangement or work to submit any nonjurisdictional customer, contract, or arrangement to the jurisdiction of the Commission. For purposes of calculating the caps established in this subsection, all net energy metering
shall be counted, whenever interconnected, and shall include net energy metering interconnected pursuant to § 56-594, agricultural net energy metering, and any net energy metering entered into with a third-party provider registered
pursuant to subsection K. Net energy metering with nonjurisdictional customers entered into prior to July 1, 2019, may be counted toward the caps, in the discretion of the cooperative, as net energy metering if the nonjurisdictional
customer takes service pursuant to a cooperative’s net energy metering rider. Net energy metering with nonjurisdictional customers entered into on or after July 1, 2019, shall be counted toward the caps by default unless the cooperative
has reason to exclude such net energy metering as subject to a separate contract or arrangement. Each electric cooperative governed by this section shall publish information regarding the calculation and status of its caps pursuant
to this subsection, or the electric cooperative’s systemwide cap established in § 56-585.4 if applicable, on the electric cooperative’s website.

An electric cooperative may, without Commission approval or the requirement of any filing other than as provided in this subsection, upon the adoption by its board of directors of a resolution so providing, raise the caps established in subsection F,
with any increase allocated among residential, not-for-profit and nonjurisdictional, and other nonresidential customers as the board of directors may find to be in the interests of the electric cooperative’s membership. The electric
cooperative shall promptly file a revised net energy metering compliance filing with the Commission for informational purposes.

Any residential eligible customer-generator who owns and operates, or contracts with other persons to own, operate, or both, an electrical generating facility with a capacity that exceeds 10 kilowatts shall pay to its supplier, in addition to any other
charges authorized by law, a monthly standby charge. The amount of the standby charge and the terms and conditions under which it is assessed shall be in accordance with a methodology developed by the supplier and approved by the
Commission. The Commission shall approve a supplier’s proposed standby charge methodology if it finds that the standby charges collected from all such eligible customer-generators allow the supplier to recover only the portion
of the supplier’s infrastructure costs that are properly associated with serving such eligible customer-generators. Such an eligible customer-generator shall not be liable for a standby charge until the date specified in an order
of the Commission approving its supplier’s methodology.

Any eligible agricultural customer-generator interconnected in an electric cooperative service territory prior to July 1, 2019, shall continue to be governed by § 56-594 and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto throughout the grandfathering period
described in subsection A of § 56-594.

Any eligible customer-generator served by a competitive service provider pursuant to the provisions of § 56-577 shall engage in net energy metering only with such supplier and pursuant only to tariffs filed by such supplier. Such an eligible customer-generator
shall pay the full portion of its distribution charges, without offset or netting, to its electric cooperative.

After the conclusion of the Commission’s rulemaking proceeding pursuant to subsection L, third-party partial requirements power purchase agreements, the purpose of which is to finance the purchase of renewable generation facilities by eligible customer-generators
through the sale of electricity, shall be permitted pursuant to the provisions of this section only for those retail customers and nonjurisdictional customers of the electric cooperative that are exempt from federal income taxation,
unless otherwise permitted by § 56-585.4 or subsection M. No person shall offer a third-party partial requirements power purchase agreement in the service territory of an electric cooperative without fulfilling the registration
requirements set forth in this section and complying with applicable Commission rules, including those adopted pursuant to subdivision L 2.

After August 1, 2019, but before January 1, 2020, the Commission shall initiate a rulemaking proceeding to promulgate the regulations necessary to implement this section as follows:

In conducting such a proceeding, the Commission may require notice to be given to current eligible customer-generators and eligible agricultural customer-generators but shall not require general publication of the notice. An opportunity to request a hearing
shall be afforded, but a hearing is not required. In the rulemaking proceeding, the electric cooperatives governed by this section shall be required to submit compliance filings, but no other individual proceedings shall
be required or conducted.

In promulgating regulations to govern third-party power purchase agreement providers as retail sellers, the Commission shall:

Direct the staff to administer a registration system for such providers;

Enumerate in its regulations the jurisdiction of the Commission over providers, generally limited in scope to the behavior of providers, customer complaints, and their compliance with the registration requirements and stating clearly that civil contract
disputes and claims for damages against providers shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission;

Enumerate in its regulations the maximum extent of its authority over the providers, to be limited to any or all of:

Monetary penalties against registered providers not to exceed $30,000 per provider registration;

Orders for providers to cease or desist from a certain practice, act, or omission;

Debarment of registered providers;

The issuance of orders to show cause; and

Authority incident to subdivisions (1) through (4);

Delineate in its regulations two classes of providers, one for residential customers and one for nonresidential customers;

Direct the staff to set up a self-certification system as described in this subdivision;

Establish business practice and consumer protection standards from a national renewable energy association whose business is germane to the businesses of the providers;

Require providers to comply with other applicable Commission regulations governing interconnection and safety, including utility procedures governing the same;

Require minimum capitalization or other bond or surety that, in the judgment of the Commission, is necessary for adequate consumer protection and in the public interest;

Require the payment of a fee of $250 for residential and nonresidential provider registration; and

Provide that no registered provider, by virtue of that status alone, shall be considered a public utility or competitive service provider for purposes of this title.

An electric cooperative may, without approval of the Commission or the requirement of any filing other than as provided in this subsection, and upon the adoption by its board of directors of a resolution so providing, permit the use of any third-party
partial requirements power purchase agreement, the purpose of which agreement is to finance the purchase of renewable generation facilities by eligible customer-generators through the sale of electricity for residential retail
customers, nonresidential retail customers, or both. The electric cooperative shall promptly file a revised net energy metering compliance filing with the Commission for informational purposes.

3.
The self-certification system described in this subdivision shall require a provider to affirm to the staff, under the penalty of revocation of registration, (i) that it is licensed to do business in Virginia; (ii) the names
of the responsible officers of the provider entity; (iii) that its named officers have no felony convictions or convictions for crimes of moral turpitude; (iv) that it will abide by all applicable Commission regulations promulgated
under this section or for purposes of interconnections and safety; (v) that it will appoint an officer to be a primary liaison to the staff; (vi) that it will appoint an employee to be a primary contact for customer complaints; (vii)
that it will have and disclose to customers a dispute resolution procedure; (viii) that it has specified in its registration materials in which territories it intends to offer power purchase agreements; (ix) that it, and each of its
named officers, agree to submit themselves to the jurisdiction of the Commission as described in this subdivision; and (x) that, once registered, the provider shall report any material changes in its registration materials to the staff,
as a continuing obligation of registration. The staff shall send a copy of the registration materials to each cooperative in whose territory the provider intends to offer power purchase agreements. The staff, once satisfied that the
certifications required pursuant to this subdivision are complete, and not more than 30 days following the initial and complete submittal of the registration materials, shall enter the provider onto the official register of providers.
No formal Commission proceeding is required for registration but may be initiated if the staff (a) has reason to doubt the veracity of the certifications of the provider or (b) in any other case, if, in the judgment of the staff, extenuating
or extraordinary circumstances exist that warrant a proceeding. The staff shall not investigate the corporate structure, financing, bookkeeping, accounting practices, contracting practices, prices, or terms and conditions in a third-party
partial requirements power purchase agreement. Nothing in this section shall abridge the right of any person, including the Office of Attorney General, from proceeding in a cause of action under the Virginia Consumer Protection Act,
§ 59.1-196 et seq.

4.
The Commission shall complete such rulemaking procedure within 12 months of its initiation.

History.
2019, cc. 742, 763; 2022, cc. 363, 364.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 2 provides: “That no later than 60 days after the effective date of this act each Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall convene a stakeholder process to
make recommendations to the utility concerning (i) the development of retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing that take advantage of advanced metering technology and related investments in customer information
systems; (ii) the development of incentive programs for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers using advanced metering technology served under such time-varying rate schedules;
(iii) the possible transition of net metering customers using advanced metering technology to the time-varying rate schedules; (iv) peak shaving programs; (v) the provision of on-site distributed renewable generation to multifamily
dwellings; and (vi) related system effects and requirements arising from distributed generation resources. An independent facilitator with expertise in rate design, cost recovery, and solar markets, compensated by the utility, offset
by such contributions from members of the stakeholder group as the members deem appropriate, shall facilitate such stakeholder process. The utility shall consult with the stakeholder group and the State Corporation Commission prior
to engaging the independent facilitator. Such stakeholder process shall include representatives from the utility, the State Corporation Commission, the office of Consumer Counsel of the Attorney General, the Department of Mines, Minerals
and Energy, net-metering program administrators, customer-generators, agricultural customer-generators, solar energy program implementers, solar energy providers, energy efficiency advocates, other residential and small business customers,
and any other interested stakeholder who the utility deems appropriate for inclusion in such process. The utility shall report on the status of the work of the stakeholder group and the programs developed in conjunction with such stakeholder
group, including the petitions filed and the determination thereon, to the Governor, the State Corporation Commission, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor on January 1, 2020, and thereafter on
January 1 of each successive year. The scope of the work of the stakeholder group convened pursuant to this enactment shall include the following:

“1. In developing the retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing that take advantage of advanced metering technology, the stakeholder group shall include at least one non-demand schedule.

“2. In developing incentive programs for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers using advanced metering technology served under such time-varying rate schedules, the stakeholder group shall seek to
accelerate solar development without adversely impacting other non-solar customers and to establish appropriate incentives to sustain the program, including consideration of the expiration of federal tax incentives available. Any such
incentive program shall be limited to net-metering customers until other customers receive advanced metering technology.

“3. In developing recommendations for the possible transition of net metering customers to the time-varying rate schedules, the stakeholder group shall (i) recommend the timing and increases in the net-metering cap to take advantage of the deployment
of advanced metering technology and the approval of time-varying rate schedules, in a range estimated to be between two percent and four percent, and (ii) recommend appropriate increases in customer class caps, aligned with potential
system cap increases, and the timing of deployment of advanced metering technology, taking into consideration infrastructure costs and rate impacts of higher solar distributed generation capacity. The stakeholder group shall recommend
capacity and market milestones for growth of solar distributed generation capacity.

“4. The stakeholder group shall develop recommendations related to distributed generation resources, including rate design options for the possible transition from retail net metering to successor time-varying rate schedules, recognizing the dependency
of such rate design to the deployment of advanced metering technology. The stakeholder group design shall encourage rate stability and allow sufficient transition time for customer education. The stakeholder group shall seek to encourage
voluntary transition to time-varying rate schedules and shall provide mechanisms to gather data from such early adopters in order to minimize program impacts on existing net metering customers and other ratepayers. The stakeholder
group shall make recommendations about the appropriate grandfathering of existing net metering customers who elect not to be served under the time-varying rate schedules.

“5. The stakeholder group may address the availability of power purchase agreements, standby and demand charges, Schedule 19 PURPA contracts, distributed generation storage deployment, and other topics that the facilitator deems appropriate.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 3 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing, including at least one non-demand rate schedule. Customer-generators or agricultural customer-generators participating in net metering may elect to be served under such
time-varying rate schedule at such time as the customer-generator or agricultural customer-generator is served by advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to the utility.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 4 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
an incentive program for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers served under time-varying retail rate schedules that have advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to
the utility.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 363 and 364 are identical, and deleted “up to a cumulative total of seven percent of system peak, calculated according to the methodology described in subsection F” following “established in subsection F” in subsection G; inserted
“or subsection M” in subsection K; substituted “Enumerate” for “Establish enumerate” in subdivision L 2 c in the introductory language; and added subsection M.

§ 56-594.01:1.
Local facilities usage charges; electric cooperatives.

For the purpose of this section:

“Electric cooperative” or “cooperative” means a utility formed under or subject to Chapter 9.1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.) and subject to regulation as to rates and service by the Commission.

“Customer” means a customer interconnected to facilities of an electric cooperative pursuant to 20VAC5-314, generating or interconnected for export, which customer is neither selling power to the cooperative nor interconnected pursuant to § 56-594.01
or 56-594.2.

Any customer may enter into an agreement for local facilities usage charges, which may be denominated as an operations and maintenance agreement or facilities agreement or otherwise. Such agreement shall be deemed just and reasonable by operation of law
without separate approval by the Commission.

In the absence of an agreement between the parties, an electric cooperative may apply at any time to the Commission for a tariff for local facilities usage charges for the use of cooperative system facilities. Local facilities usage charges shall be designed
by the cooperative, either on the basis of line-miles of utility facilities used or the capacity of the interconnecting facility, or on the basis of a combination of these factors. The Commission shall approve a just and reasonable
rate. In approving such rate, the Commission shall consider (i) the ongoing costs of operating and maintaining all local utility facilities used by interconnecting customers to access a contract path to PJM Interconnection, LLC,
market delivery points, including a reasonable margin and all costs of any associated regulatory proceeding, and (ii) standard utility practices. The Commission is not required to conduct a hearing on any application pursuant to
this subsection, but the Commission shall order notice to each affected customer and an opportunity to comment. Any party to the proceeding shall have the right to request a hearing on the application. Any proceeding conducted
pursuant to this subsection shall be completed within 12 months of its commencement. Once the Commission approves a tariff for charges as described in this subsection, any interconnected customer shall be subject to the tariff
thereafter. However, any agreements entered into pursuant to subsection B shall continue to have force and effect according to their terms and shall not be subject to the tariff unless the customer desires to transition to tariffed
services.

In the absence of an agreement executed pursuant to subsection B or a specific tariff approved for local facilities usage charges pursuant to subsection C, any electric cooperative with a previously approved tariff for excess facilities charges may use
such tariff to recover local facilities usage charges without seeking separate approval from the Commission. Any customer impacted by any action of a cooperative pursuant to this subsection shall have the right to petition the
Commission for redress and review of the charges as applied to the customer by initiating a petition proceeding pursuant to subsection C of 5VAC5-20-100. The petitioner shall bear the burden of proof in such proceeding. If a cooperative’s
acts are found to be unjust or unreasonable, such a proceeding shall include the establishment of a tariff pursuant to subsection C. If such a proceeding includes the establishment of a tariff pursuant to subsection C, the cooperative
shall bear the burden of proof. The results of any such proceeding shall not, in any case, invalidate an excess facilities tariff or charges as to any person other than the customer initiating the proceeding.

The provisions of this section shall be applied notwithstanding any other provision of law.

History.
2022, cc. 364, 363.